Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3206
Board; fees.

(1) The board shall charge and collect fees for its services under the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act as follows:

(a) An application fee of no more than three hundred fifty dollars;

(b) An initial registration fee of no more than two thousand dollars;

(c) A renewal registration fee of no more than two thousand dollars; and

(d) A late renewal processing fee of twenty-five dollars for each month or portion of a month the renewal registration fee is late.

(2) The board may collect and transmit to the Appraisal Subcommittee any fees established by the Appraisal Subcommittee under Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, the AMC rule, and any policy or rule established by the Appraisal Subcommittee required for inclusion on the AMC Registry.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB989, § 7.